src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Perspro_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - antaa - paradigmgroup v1: # meaning 'to give'/'ge' - GOLD Verb - antaa - ok : # Verb 'to live' type v1 #test odd!
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: minun  
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: minua  
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: minut
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: minuksi
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: minutta
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: minussa
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: minusta
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: minhuun
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: mulla
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: multa
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: mulle
     mie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: minuna
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: sie
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: sinun
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: sinua
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: sinut
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: sinuksi
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: sinutta
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: sinussa
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: sinusta
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: sinhuun
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: sulla
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: sulta
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: sulle
     sie+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: sinuna
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: hään
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: hänen
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: hänet
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: häntä
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: häneksi
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: hänettä
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: hänessä
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: hänestä
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: hänheen
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: hällä
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: hältä
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: hälle
     hään+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: hänenä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: se
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: sen
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Par: sitä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Tra: siksi
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: settä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ine: siinä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ela: siittä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: siihen
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ade: sillä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abl: siltä
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+All: sille
     se+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: sinä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: met
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: meän
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: meät
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: meitä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: meiksi
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: meittä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: meissä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: meistä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: [meihiin, meihin]
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: meilä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: meiltä
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: meile
     met+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: meinä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: tet
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: teän
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: teät
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: teitä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: teiksi
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: teittä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: teissä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: teistä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: [teihiin, teihin]
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: teilä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: teiltä
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: teile
     tet+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: teinä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: het
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: heän
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: heät
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: heitä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: heiksi
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: heittä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: heissä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: heistä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: [heihiin, heihin]
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: heilä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: heiltä
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: heile
     het+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: heinä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: net
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: niitten
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Par: niitä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Tra: niiksi
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: niittä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ine: niissä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ela: niistä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: niihin
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ade: niilä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abl: niiltä
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+All: niile
     net+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess: niinä  
